Washington statutes.
RCW 8.24.015

Joinder of surrounding property owners authorized.

In any proceeding for the condemnation of land for a private way of necessity, the owner of any land surrounding and contiguous to the property which land might contain a site for the private way of necessity may be joined as a party.

[ 1988 c 129 s 1.]